Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.315.105

Regional committees—Appointment and terms of members—New regional committees.

(1) There is hereby created in each educational service district a committee which shall be known as the regional committee on school district organization, which committee shall be composed of not less than seven nor more than nine registered voters of the educational service district, the number to correspond with the number of board member districts established for the governance of the educational service district in which the regional committee is located.

(2) Members of each regional committee shall be appointed to serve a four-year term by the educational service district board of the district in which the regional committee is located. One member of the regional committee shall be appointed from each such educational service district board member district. Appointed members of regional committees must be registered voters and reside in the educational service district board member district from which they are appointed. Members of regional committees who were elected before June 12, 2008, may serve the remainder of their four-year terms. Vacancies occurring for any reason, including at the end of the term of any member of a regional committee who was elected before June 12, 2008, shall be filled by appointment by the educational service district board of directors as provided in this section.

(3) In the event of a change in the number of educational service districts or in the number of educational service district board members pursuant to chapter 28A.310 RCW, a new regional committee shall be appointed for each affected educational service district at the expiration of the terms of the majority of the members of the regional committee. Those persons who were serving on a regional committee within an educational service district affected by a change in the number of districts or board members shall continue to constitute the regional committee for the educational service district within which they are registered to vote until the majority of a new board has been appointed.

(4) No appointed member of a regional committee may continue to serve on the committee if he or she ceases to be a registered voter of the educational service district board member district or if he or she is absent from three consecutive meetings of the committee without an excuse acceptable to the committee.

[ 2008 c 159 s 4; 1985 c 385 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.030. Prior: 1947 c 266 s 11, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4693-30, part; prior: 1941 c 248 s 3, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 4709-3, part. Formerly RCW 28A.315.040, 28A.57.030, 28.57.030, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—1985 c 385: See note following RCW 28A.315.025.